Idaho, session 2026, H0642.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. As a result of the hor-
rific, violent, and targeted attack on firefighters in North Idaho on June
29, 2025, that resulted in the murder of two Idaho public safety officers and
significant injuries to others, it was identified that catastrophic bene-
fits available to surviving spouses or dependent children of public safety
officers who died in the line of duty were less than the catastrophic injury
benefit available to public safety officers who were catastrophically in-
jured but survived.
This legislation creates consistency between benefits for a cata-
strophic injury or death that occurs in the line of duty, ensuring that
one benefit is not greater than the other. Specifically, this legislation
increases the lump-sum death benefit available to surviving spouses or de-
pendent children to match the catastrophic injury benefit. It also provides
a pension benefit to surviving spouses that is consistent with the benefit
currently available when a public safety officer dies following qualifica-
tion for the catastrophic injury benefit.
The increase in benefits as a result of this legislation will be funded
solely through public safety officer pension contribution rates.
SECTION 2. That Section 59-1352B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
59-1352B. PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER CATASTROPHIC INJURY OR DEATH LINE OF
DUTY BENEFITS. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Catastrophic injury" means a sudden, violent, life-threatening,
duty-related injury sustained by an active member within the scope of
the public safety officer's duties and within the department policy
that is due to an externally caused event such as a motor vehicle colli-
sion, gunshot wound, aggravated battery, structural collapse, signifi-
cant fall, or other external event or events that is not self-inflicted
or the result of intoxication; provided, however, that no psychological
injury, disorder, or condition shall be considered a catastrophic in-
jury under this definition. The injury, if it does not result in death,
must be of such severity that it causes the loss of ability to maintain
certifications required by the state of Idaho, the member's department,


or both. The injury shall be supported by evidence of one (1) or more of
the following conditions:
(i) Total, complete, permanent, and uncorrectable loss of sight
in both eyes;
(ii) Total, complete, permanent, and uncorrectable loss of hear-
ing in both ears;
(iii) Total, complete, and permanent loss of the ability to speak;
(iv) Total, complete, and permanent loss of the use of one (1) or
both feet at or above the ankle;
(v) Total, complete, and permanent loss of the use of one (1) or
both hands at or above the wrist;
(vi) Injury to the spine that results in a total, permanent, and
complete paralysis of both arms, both legs, or one (1) arm and one
(1) leg; or
(vii) An externally caused, physical traumatic injury to the brain
that renders the member physically or mentally unable to perform
the duties of a public safety officer; or
(viii) A catastrophic injury that results in death.
(b) "Catastrophic injury that results in death" means the death of a
public safety officer in a manner that would qualify for the payment
of death benefits pursuant to regulations issued by the United States
department of justice pursuant to 34 U.S.C. 10281; provided, however,
that the retirement board is authorized to revise such definition.
(b) (c) "Catastrophic line of duty benefits" means benefits payable to
a:
(i) A public safety officer who sustains a catastrophic injury
pursuant to this section; or
(ii) The surviving spouse of a public safety officer who sustained
a catastrophic injury that results in death.
(d) "Dependent child" means a surviving natural or legally adopted
child who is under twenty-one (21) years of age at the time of a public
safety officer's catastrophic injury that results in death.
(c) (e) "Public safety officer" means a police officer member as set
forth in section 59-1303, Idaho Code, or a firefighter member as set
forth in section 59-1302(16), Idaho Code.
(2) A public safety officer who sustains a catastrophic injury or the
surviving spouse of a public safety officer who sustained a catastrophic in-
jury that results in death as set forth in this section is eligible for:
(a) A onetime permanent catastrophic injury benefit in the amount of
five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); and
(b) An ongoing annual benefit in an amount not less than seventy-five
thousand dollars ($75,000) per year, to be adjusted every four (4) years
pursuant to an actuarial study to determine the change in average public
safety officer benefits over the previous four (4) years.
(3) In the event of a public safety officer's catastrophic injury that
results in death, if there is no surviving spouse, the public safety offi-
cer's dependent children are eligible for the benefit provided for in sub-
section (2)(a) of this section. Benefits to dependent children shall be paid
in accordance with the provisions of chapter 8, title 68, Idaho Code; pro-


vided that when there are multiple dependent children, the benefit shall be
divided equally among them.
(3) (4) In the event a public safety officer receiving the catastrophic
line of duty benefit as set forth in this section dies and leaves a surviv-
ing spouse to whom the member was married at the time of the catastrophic in-
jury, such surviving spouse shall receive the catastrophic line of duty ben-
efit for the duration of such spouse's life to which the public safety offi-
cer would have been entitled.
(4) (5) The benefits payable under this section shall not be subject to
Idaho state income tax.
(5) (6) A public safety officer, the public safety officer's surviving
spouse, or the public safety officer's surviving dependent child who seeks
to obtain benefits under this section shall apply to the retirement board
within twelve (12) months of the date of the incident resulting in the public
safety officer's catastrophic injury. No benefit shall be payable unless
the retirement board determines eligibility pursuant to the requirements of
this section. A public safety officer's refusal to submit to a medical exam-
ination ordered by the board before the commencement of a catastrophic line
of duty benefit or at any reasonable time thereafter shall constitute proof
that the member is not eligible for the benefits provided for in this sec-
tion.
(6) (7) The benefits provided for in this section shall not be in addi-
tion to other benefits under this chapter.
(7) (8) If a public safety officer who qualifies for benefits provided
for in this section again becomes an employee in a nonpublic safety offi-
cer position as defined in sections 59-1302(14) and (16) and 59-1303, Idaho
Code, as a result of returning to employment with an employer as defined in
section 59-1302(15), Idaho Code, the public safety officer may elect to con-
tinue receiving benefits and not accrue additional service. In such circum-
stance, no contributions shall be made by the member during such reemploy-
ment and the public safety officer catastrophic line of duty benefit payable
on the behalf of the member shall continue.
(8) (9) It is the intent of the legislature that this benefit shall be
funded solely by public safety officers in perpetuity and not by an employer
as defined in section 59-1302(15), Idaho Code. Therefore, the costs asso-
ciated with providing this benefit as determined by the board shall be paid
solely by public safety officers. An actuarial cost analysis of the benefit
will be performed every four (4) years by the board. However, in instances
involving a catastrophic injury that results in death, the first one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) of the benefit shall be paid for by the employers
of public safety officers as an additional contribution component separate
and distinct from all other obligations under this chapter. The portion of
costs to be paid by the employers of public safety officers pursuant to this
subsection is a continuation of how such costs were previously paid for pub-
lic safety officer death benefits. Such costs shall be paid in a manner as
determined by the board.
(10) Any individual who qualified for or was eligible to receive the
public safety officer death benefit between July 1, 2021, and the effective
date of this subsection shall receive the balance of the improved benefit as
provided for in this section.


SECTION 3. That Section 59-1361A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.